Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.70.050

City electrical code—State safety regulations.

Every code city may adopt ordinances regulating or otherwise controlling the installation of electrical wiring, equipment, apparatus or appliances as authorized by *RCW 19.28.360 and by other general law and shall obey, observe and comply with every order, approval, direction or requirement made by the director or the commission under authority of chapter 19.29 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.70.050.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.28.360 was recodified as RCW 19.28.141 pursuant to 2000 c 238 s 102.